Georgia, session 2025_26, HB407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Hemp Industry Growth and
Business Partnership Tax Credit Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"48-7-29.27.
(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, each taxpayer shall be allowed
an income tax credit against the tax imposed by this article equal to 10 percent of such
H. B. 407
- 1 -

LC 59 0075ER
taxpayer's costs of doing business with Georgia grown hemp owners and suppliers,
or $100,000.00 per taxpayer, whichever is less.
(b) The Commissioner of Agriculture shall provide clear guidelines for the application and
distribution of the tax credit.
(c) The Commissioner of Agriculture shall provide annual reports on the status of the tax
credit program, including the number of applicants, the amount of tax credits issued, and
the impact of the tax credit on the Georgia grown hemp industry.
(d) Noncompliance with the provisions of this Code section may result in revocation of
the tax credit.
(e) In no event shall the total amount of any tax credit allowed under this Code section for
a taxable year exceed the taxpayer's income tax liability. No such tax credit shall be
allowed the taxpayer against prior years' tax liability. Any unused tax credit shall be
allowed to be carried forward to apply to the taxpayer's next five years' tax liability."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 407
- 2 -